incubator/apertium-ibo/apertium-ibo.ibo.twoc
Alphabet 

 a ǎ â b c ç d ɛ e é ə f g h i ı j k l m n ŋ o ô ɔ p q r s t u ú v w x y z ɑ ʉ 
 A Ǎ Â B C Ç D Ɛ E É Ə F G H   I J K L M N Ŋ O Ô Ɔ P Q R S T U Ú V W X Y Z Ɑ Ʉ 

%<v%> 

%[%+A%]:0
%[%+i%]:0

; 

Sets 

Verb = %<v%>  ; 

Rules

"Morphotactics for participle A- I"
%[%+A%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+prc%]:0 ; 

"Morphotactics for participle A- II"
%[%+prc%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except 
       %[%+A%]:0 (:*) _  ;

"Morphotactics for infinitive i- I"
%[%+i%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except
       _ (:*) %[%+inf%]:0 ; 

"Morphotactics for infinitive i- II"
%[%+inf%]:0 /<= _  ;
   except 
       %[%+i%]:0 (:*) _  ;
